Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5420
Certificate; application; fee.

(1) An applicant for a certificate as a utilization review agent shall submit an application to the department upon a form which may be obtained from the department. The application shall be signed and verified by the applicant.

Along with the application, the applicant shall pay the application fee of three hundred dollars.

(2) As a part of the application, the applicant shall submit the following:

(a) Documentation that the applicant has received approval or accreditation by the American Accreditation HealthCare Commission/URAC, or a similar organization which has standards for utilization review agents that are substantially similar to the standards of the American Accreditation HealthCare Commission/URAC, and which has been approved by the director;

(b) A statement of the street and mailing address of the entity, telephone number of the entity, and a list of the principal officers of the entity responsible for its operation, management, and control; and

(c) Such other reasonable information or documentation as the department requires for enforcement of the Utilization Review Act.

Laws 1992, LB 428, § 10;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 44-5410;

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 5.